Utah statutes.
41-6a-1627.   Mirrors.
(1) (a)  A motor vehicle shall be equipped with a mirror mounted on the left
side of the vehicle.
(b)  A mirror under Subsection (1)(a) shall be located to reflect to the
driver a view of the highway to the rear of the vehicle.
(2) (a)  Except for a motorcycle, in addition to the mirror required under
Subsection (1), a motor vehicle shall be equipped with a mirror mounted either
inside the vehicle approximately in the center or outside the vehicle on the
right side.
(b)  The mirror under Subsection (2)(a) shall be located to reflect to the
driver a view of the highway to the rear of the vehicle.
